en: Carburetor choke type: Automatic (mechanical); Electric; Hot air (divorced); Manual; No choke; Water heated; Other
nb: Forgasserdrosseltype: Automatisk (mekanisk); Elektrisk; Varmluft (separat); Manuell; Ingen choke; Vannvarmet; Annet
nl: Carburettor choke type: Automatisch (mechanisch); Elektrisch; Hete lucht (gescheiden); Handmatig; Geen choke; Waterverwarmd; Overige
sv: Förgasarchoketyp: Automatisk (mekanisk); Elektrisk; Varmluft (separat); Manuell; Ingen choke; Vattenuppvärmd; Annat
da: Karburatorens chokertype: Automatisk (mekanisk); Elektrisk; Varm luft (adskilt); Manuel; Ingen choker; Vandopvarmet; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul de șoc pentru carburator: Automat (mecanic); Electric; Aer cald (separat); Manual; Fără șoc; Încălzit cu apă; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta čoka rasplinjača: Automatski (mehanički); Električni; Topli zrak (odvojeno); Ručni; Bez čoka; Grijano vodom; Ostalo
ja: キャブレターチョークタイプ: オートマチック (機械式); 電動式; 熱風式 (ディボースド); マニュアル; チョークなし; 温水式; その他
lt-LT: Karbiuratoriaus sklendės tipas: Automatinis (mechaninis); Elektrinis; Karšto oro (atskirtas); Rankinis; Be sklendės; Šildomas vandeniu; Kita
ko: 기화기 초크 유형: 자동(기계식); 전동식; 열풍식(분리형); 수동; 초크 없음; 온수 가열식; 기타
bg-BG: Тип дросел на карбуратора: Автоматичен (механичен); Електрически; С горещ въздух (отделен); Ръчен; Без смукач; С водно отопление; Друго
th: ประเภทโช้กของคาร์บูเรเตอร์: อัตโนมัติ (กลไก); ไฟฟ้า; ลมร้อน (แยกส่วน); ปรับเอง; ไม่มีโช้ก; อุ่นด้วยน้ำ; อื่นๆ
hu: Karburátor fojtószelep típusa: Automatikus (mechanikus); Elektromos; Meleg levegős (különálló); Manuális; Szívató nélküli; Vízfűtéses; Egyéb
de: Art des Vergaser-Chokes: Automatisch (mechanisch); Elektrisch; Heißluft (separat); Manuell; Kein Choke; Wasserbeheizt; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de afogador do carburador: Automático (mecânico); Elétrico; Ar quente (divorciado); Manual; Sem afogador; Aquecido a água; Outro
cs: Typ sytiče karburátoru: Automatický (mechanický); Elektrický; Horkovzdušný (oddělený); Manuální; Bez sytiče; Vyhřívaný vodou; Jiné
tr: Karbüratör jikle tipi: Otomatik (mekanik); Elektrikli; Sıcak hava (ayrık); Manuel; Jiklesiz; Su ısıtmalı; Diğer
pl: Typ ssania gaźnika: Automatyczne (mechaniczne); Elektryczne; Gorące powietrze (oddzielne); Ręczne; Bez ssania; Podgrzewane wodą; Inne
zh-CN: 化油器阻风门型: 自动（机械式）; 电动式; 热空气（分离式）; 手动式; 无阻风门; 水热式; 其他
fr: Type de starter de carburateur: Automatique (mécanique); Électrique; Air chaud (séparé); Manuel; Sans starter; Chauffé à l’eau; Autre
vi: Loại bướm gió bộ chế hòa khí: Tự động (cơ học); Điện; Khí nóng (tách rời); Thủ công; Không bướm gió; Gia nhiệt bằng nước; Khác
zh-TW: 化油器阻風門類型: 自動 (機械); 電動; 熱空氣 (分離式); 手動; 無阻風門; 水熱式; 其他
sk-SK: Typ sýtiča karburátora: Automatický (mechanický); Elektrický; Teplovzdušný (oddelený); Manuálny; Bez sýtiča; Vyhrievaný vodou; Iný
fi: Kaasuttimen rikastimen tyyppi: Automaattinen (mekaaninen); Sähköinen; Kuuma ilma (erillinen); Manuaalinen; Ei rikastinta; Vesilämmitteinen; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta dušilne lopute uplinjača: Samodejni (mehanski); Električni; Topel zrak (ločeno); Ročni; Brez čoka; Vodno ogrevan; Drugo
es: Tipo de estrangulador de carburador: Automático (mecánico); Eléctrico; Aire caliente (separado); Manual; Sin estrangulador; Calentado por agua; Otro
ru: Тип дроссельной заслонки карбюратора: Автоматическая (механическая); Электрическая; Горячий воздух (раздельная); Ручная; Без воздушной заслонки; С водяным подогревом; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de afogador do carburador: Automático (mecânico); Elétrico; Ar quente (separado); Manual; Sem estrangulador; Aquecido a água; Outro
it: Tipo di starter del carburatore: Automatico (meccanico); Elettrico; Aria calda (separato); Manuale; Senza starter; Riscaldato ad acqua; Altro
el: Τύπος τσοκ καρμπυρατέρ: Αυτόματο (μηχανικό); Ηλεκτρικό; Θερμού αέρα (ξεχωριστό); Χειροκίνητο; Χωρίς τσοκ; Θερμαινόμενο με νερό; Άλλο